Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.206

Voters' rights.

(1) The rights of Washington voters are protected by its constitution and laws and include the following fundamental rights:

(a) The right of qualified voters to vote at all elections;

(b) The right of absolute secrecy of the vote. No voter may be required to disclose political faith or adherence in order to vote;

(c) The right to cast a vote for any candidate for each office without any limitation based on party preference or affiliation, of either the voter or the candidate.

(2) Nothing in subsection (1)(b) or (c) of this section alters or supersedes RCW 29A.56.020 through 29A.56.050, which govern presidential primary elections.

[ 2019 c 7 s 7; 2005 c 2 s 3 (Initiative Measure No. 872, approved November 2, 2004).]

NOTES:

Short title—Intent—Contingent effective date—2005 c 2 (Initiative Measure No. 872): See notes following RCW 29A.52.112.